Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.127

Primary.

"Primary" or "primary election" means a procedure for winnowing candidates for public office to a final list of two as part of a special or general election. Each voter has the right to cast a vote for any candidate for each office without any limitation based on party preference or affiliation, of either the voter or the candidate.

[ 2005 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004); 2003 c 111 s 122. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.130; prior: 1907 c 209 s 1, part; RRS s 5177(a). See also 1950 ex.s. c 14 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.01.130.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 29A.04.127 was amended by 2005 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 872) without cognizance of its repeal by 2004 c 271 s 193. For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025.

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.

Nonpartisan primaries: RCW 29A.52.210 through 29A.52.240.

Partisan primaries: RCW 29A.52.112 and 29A.52.121.

Presidential primary: RCW 29A.56.010 through 29A.56.060.

Times for holding primaries: RCW 29A.04.311.

PDFRCW 29A.04.127

Primary.

[2003 c 111 s 122. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.130; prior: 1907 c 209 s 1, part; RRS s 5177(a). See also 1950 ex.s. c 14 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.01.130.]
Repealed by 2004 c 271 s 193.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 29A.04.127 was amended by 2005 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 872) without cognizance of its repeal by 2004 c 271 s 193. For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025.